Vermont, session 2025-2026, H690.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1222 is amended to read
§ 1222. INSPECTION OF REGISTERED VEHICLES
(a) Except for school buses, which shall be inspected as prescribed in
section 1282 of this title, and; motor buses as defined in subdivision 4(17) of
this title, which shall be inspected twice during the calendar year at six-month
intervals,; and noncommercial motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of 14,000 pounds or less, which shall not be required to undergo safety
and emissions inspections, all motor vehicles registered in this State shall
undergo a safety and visual emissions inspection once each year and all motor
vehicles that are registered in this State and are 16 model years old or less shall
VT LEG #386336 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.690
2026 Page 2 of 2
undergo an emissions or on board diagnostic (OBD) systems inspection once
each year as applicable. Any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer not
currently inspected in this State as required pursuant to this subsection shall be
inspected within 15 days following the date of its registration in the State of
Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386336 v.1